test/src/morphology/N-veri32_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - veri: # Noun (32) veri 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     veri+N+Sg+Nom: veri
     veri+N+Sg+Gen: vere
     veri+N+Sg+Par: verd
     veri+N+Sg+Ill: verde
     veri+N+Pl+Gen: verri
     veri+N+Pl+Par: verri
     veri+N+Pl+Ill: [verrihe, verri]
     veri+N+Pl+All: [verrile, verile]
